Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1314
Liability for damages.

No independent review
organization, clinical reviewer working on behalf of an independent review
organization, or employee, agent, or contractor of an independent review organization
shall be liable in damages to any person for any opinions rendered or acts
or omissions performed within the scope of the organization's or person's
duties under the law during or upon completion of an external review conducted
pursuant to the Health Carrier External Review Act, unless the opinion was
rendered or act or omission performed in bad faith or involved gross negligence.

Laws 2013, LB147, § 14.